test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-ainus4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - `ainus3: # Adjective (17,8,4) `ainus1-3 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ainus+A+Sg+Nom: ainus
     ainus+A+Sg+Gen: [ainusõ, ainu]
     ainus+A+Sg+Par: [ainust, ainut]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ill: [ainustõ, ainuhe]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ine: [ainusõn, ainusõh, ainusõhn, ainun, ainuh, ainuhn]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ela: [ainusõst, ainust]
     ainus+A+Sg+All: [ainusõlõ, ainulõ]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ade: [ainusõl, ainul]
     ainus+A+Sg+Abl: [ainusõlt, ainult]
     ainus+A+Sg+Tra: [ainusõs, ainus]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ter: [ainusõniq, ainuniq]
     ainus+A+Sg+Abe: [ainusõldaq, ainuldaq]
     ainus+A+Sg+Com: [ainusõgaq, ainugaq]
     ainus+A+Pl+Nom: [ainusõq, ainuq]
     ainus+A+Pl+Gen: [ainuisi, ainustõ, ainuidõ, ainidõ]
     ainus+A+Pl+Par: [ainuisi, ainuid, ainit]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ill: [ainuisihe, ainuisi, ainuisidõ, ainustõhe, ainuihe, ainihe]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ine: [ainuisin, ainuisih, ainuisihn, ainustõn, ainustõh, ainustõhn, ainuin, ainuih, ainuihn, ainin, ainih, ainihn]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ela: [ainuisist, ainustõst, ainuist, ainist]
     ainus+A+Pl+All: [ainuisilõ, ainustõlõ, ainuilõ, ainilõ]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ade: [ainuisil, ainustõl, ainuil, ainil]
     ainus+A+Pl+Abl: [ainuisilt, ainustõlt, ainuilt, ainilt]
     ainus+A+Pl+Tra: [ainuisis, ainustõs, ainuis, ainis]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ter: [ainuisiniq, ainustõniq, ainuiniq, aininiq]
     ainus+A+Pl+Abe: [ainuisildaq, ainustõldaq, ainuildaq, ainildaq]
     ainus+A+Pl+Com: [ainuisigaq, ainustõgaq, ainuidõgaq, ainidõgaq]
